California statutes. Elections Code
(a) The declaration of candidacy by a candidate shall be substantially as follows:DECLARATION OF CANDIDACYI hereby declare myself a candidate for nomination to the office of ________ District Number ________ to be voted for at the primary election to be held ________, 20__, and declare the following to be true:My name is .I want my name and occupational designation to appear on the ballot as follows: ______________________________________.Addresses:Residence Business Mailing Telephone numbers: Day _________ Evening _________Internet website:_______________________________________I meet the statutory and constitutional qualifications for this office (including, but not limited to, citizenship, residency, and party preference, if required).I am at present an incumbent of the following public office(if any) __________.If nominated, I will accept the nomination and not withdraw, except as permitted by state law.Signature of candidateA candidate for voter-nominated office shall also complete all of the following:(1) I hereby certify that:(a) At the time of presentation of this declaration, as shown by my current affidavit of registration, I have disclosed the following political party preference, if any: .(b) My complete voter registration and party affiliation/preference history, from [10 years prior to current year] through the date of signing this document, is as follows:Party RegistrationCountyTimeframe (by year)(2) Pursuant to Section 8002.5 of the Elections Code, select one of the following:______ Party Preference: _____________________ (insert the name of the qualified political party as disclosed upon your affidavit of registration).______ Party Preference: None (if you have declined to disclose a preference for a qualified political party upon your affidavit of registration).Dated this ___ day of _____, 20___.Signature of candidateA Notary Public or other officer completing this certificate verifies only the identity of the individual who signed the document to which this certificate is attached, and not the truthfulness, accuracy, or validity of that document.State of California )County of ) ss. )Subscribed and sworn to before me this ___ day of ________, 20____.Signature of Notary Public (or other official)Notary Public SealExamined and certified by me this ________ day of ________,
 20____. County Elections OfficialWARNING: Every person acting on behalf of a candidate is guilty of a misdemeanor who deliberately fails to file at the proper time and in the proper place any declaration of candidacy in the person’s possession which is entitled to be filed under the provisions of the Elections Code Section 18202.(b) At the discretion of the elections official, a candidate for a judicial office, or a candidate for any office whose voter registration information is
 confidential under Section 2166, 2166.5, 2166.7, 2166.8, or 2166.9 may withhold the candidate’s residence address from the declaration of candidacy. If a candidate does not state the candidate’s residence address on the declaration of candidacy, the elections official shall verify whether the candidate’s address is within the appropriate political subdivision and add the notation “verified” where appropriate on the declaration.

(c) If a candidate will not be within the State of California during the entire nomination period and is unable to appear before a notary public appointed by the Secretary of State or other California official to complete their declaration of candidacy, the candidate may appear before a notary public in another state to complete the declaration of candidacy. The candidate shall attach to their declaration of candidacy a notarial certificate from the out-of-state notary that complies with the law of the notary’s
 state.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 300, Sec. 4.   (AB 1392)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

8041.

(a) The nomination paper shall be in substantially the following form:NOMINATION PAPERI, the undersigned signer for ______ for nomination to the office of ____, to be voted for at the primary election to be held on the ____ day of ____, 20__, hereby assert as follows:I am a resident of ____ County and registered to vote at the address shown on this paper. I am not at this time a
 signer of any other nomination paper of any other candidate for the above-named office, or in case there are several places to be filled in the above-named office, I have not signed more nomination papers than there are places to be filled in the above-named office. My residence is correctly set forth after my signature hereto:Name Residence (b) The affidavit of the circulator shall read as follows:AFFIDAVIT OF THE CIRCULATORI, ______, solemnly swear (or affirm) all of the following:1.That I am 18 years of age or older.2.That my residence address, including street and number, is
.
 [If no street or number exists, a designation of my residence adequate to readily ascertain its location is
.]3.That the
 signatures on this section of the nomination paper were obtained between _____, 20__, and _____, 20__; that I circulated the petition and I witnessed the signatures on this section of the nomination paper being written; and that, to the best of my information and belief, each signature is the genuine signature of the person whose name it purports to be.Signed Subscribed and sworn to before me this ___________ day of _____________, 20__.(SEAL)Notary Public (or other official) Examined and certified by me this ___________ day of _____________, 20__. Elections OfficialWARNING: Every person acting on behalf of a candidate is guilty of a misdemeanor who deliberately fails to file at the proper time and in the proper place any nomination paper in his or her possession which is entitled to be filed under Section 18202 of the Elections Code.(c) If the nomination paper is for a partisan office, the nomination paper shall include a statement indicating the party preference of the signer of the nomination paper.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2013, Ch. 278, Sec. 13.   (SB 213)   Effective January 1, 2014.)
-------------------------------------------

8042.

The Secretary of State shall establish uniform filing forms for candidates to use when filing a declaration of candidacy pursuant to Section 8040 and nomination papers pursuant to Section 8041.

(History: Added by Stats. 2022, Ch. 148, Sec. 1.   (AB 2577)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 4. Circulation and Signatures—Nomination Documents [8060. - 8070.]

8060.

A candidate who declares his or her candidacy shall have registered voters sign his or her nomination papers pursuant to this article.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1994, Ch. 920, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

8061.

(a) If a candidate submits an in-lieu-filing-fee petition pursuant to Section 8106, any or all signatures appearing on the petition, which would be valid under Section 8041, shall be counted towards the number of voters required to sign a nomination paper. If an in-lieu-filing-fee petition contains a requisite number of valid signatures under Section 8062, the candidate shall not be required to file nomination papers.

(b) If an in-lieu-filing-fee petition does not contain the requisite number of valid signatures as set forth in Section 8062, the candidate shall be entitled to file, within the time period allowed for filing nomination papers, a
 nomination paper in order to obtain the requisite number of valid signatures required to be submitted to the elections official on a nomination paper. A candidate who
 submits a nomination paper pursuant to this subdivision shall only be required to obtain the number of signatures thereon needed to supplement the in-lieu-filing-fee petition so that the combination of signatures appearing on the in-lieu-filing-fee petition and the nomination paper equals or exceeds the requisite number of signatures set forth in Section 8062.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2019, Ch. 562, Sec. 3.   (AB 1829)   Effective January 1, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------

8062.

(a) The number of registered voters required to sign a nomination paper for the respective offices are as follows:

(1) State office or United States Senate, not fewer than 65 nor more than 100.

(2) House of Representatives in Congress, State Senate or Assembly, State Board of Equalization, or any office voted for in more than one county, and not statewide, not fewer than 40 nor more than 60.

(3) Candidacy in a single county or any political subdivision of a county, other than State Senate or Assembly, not fewer than 20 nor more than 40.

(4) With respect to a candidate for a political party committee, if any political party has fewer than 50 voters in the state or in the county or district in which the election is to be held, one-tenth the number of voters of the party.

(5) If there are fewer than 150 voters in the county or district in which the election is to be held, not fewer than 10 nor more than 20.

(b) The provisions of this section are mandatory, not directory, and no nomination paper shall be deemed sufficient that does not comply with this section. However, this subdivision shall not be construed to prohibit withdrawal of signatures pursuant to Section 8067. This subdivision also shall not be construed to prohibit a court from validating a signature which was previously rejected upon showing of proof that the voter whose signature is in question is otherwise qualified to sign the nomination
 paper.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2012, Ch. 3, Sec. 16.   (AB 1413)   Effective February 10, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

8063.

The nomination paper shall be delivered to the elections official of the county in which the signer resides and is a voter.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1994, Ch. 920, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

8064.

The declaration of candidacy shall be obtained from, and delivered to, the elections official of the county in which the candidate resides and is a voter in accordance with Section 8028.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1994, Ch. 920, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

8065.

The elections official shall not accept for filing any nomination paper unless all blanks in the certificate are filled.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1999, Ch. 790, Sec. 33.   Effective January 1, 2000.)
-------------------------------------------

8066.

Circulators shall meet the requirements of Section 102.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2013, Ch. 278, Sec. 14.   (SB 213)   Effective January 1, 2014.)
-------------------------------------------

8067.

No more signers shall be secured for any candidate than the maximum number required in this article. If, however, through miscalculation or otherwise, more signers are secured than the maximum number, the officer with whom the nomination papers are filed shall, with the written consent of the candidate, withdraw the excess number.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1994, Ch. 920, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

8068.

Signers shall be voters in the district or political subdivision in which the candidate is to be voted on. With respect to a candidacy for partisan office, signers shall be voters who disclosed a preference, pursuant to Section 2151, for the party, if any, for which the nomination is proposed. With respect to a candidacy for voter-nominated office, signers need not have disclosed a preference for any party.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2012, Ch. 3, Sec. 17.   (AB 1413)   Effective February 10, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

8069.

No signer shall, at the time of signing a certificate, have his or her name signed to any other nomination paper for any other candidate for the same office or, in case there are several places to be filled in the same office, signed to more nomination papers for candidates for that office than there are places to be filled.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1994, Ch. 920, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

8070.

The elections official shall transmit to the Secretary of State the nomination document for each candidate for state office, United States Senator, Representative in Congress, Member of the Senate or Assembly, or the members of the State Board of Equalization.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1995, Ch. 736, Sec. 2.   Effective October 10, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 5. Verification of Nomination Signatures [8080. - 8084.]

8080.

No fee or charge shall be made or collected by any officer for verifying any nomination document or circulator’s affidavit.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1994, Ch. 920, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

8081.

Before any nomination document is filed in the office of the county elections official or forwarded for filing in the office of the Secretary of State, the county elections official shall verify the signatures and the political preferences, if required, of the signers on the nomination paper with the registration affidavits on file in the office of the county elections official. The county elections official shall mark “not sufficient” any signature that does not appear in the same handwriting as appears on the affidavit of registration in his or her office, or that is accompanied by a declaration of party preference that is not in accordance with the declaration of party preference in the affidavit of registration. The county elections official may cease to verify signatures once the minimum requisite number of
 signatures has been verified.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2009, Ch. 1, Sec. 22.   (SB 6)   Effective January 1, 2010.   Operative January 1, 2011, pursuant to Sec. 67 of Ch. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

8082.

All nomination documents that are required to be filed in the office of the Secretary of State, within five days after being left with the county elections official in compliance with Section 8020, shall be forwarded by the county elections official to the Secretary of State, who shall receive and file them. The county elections official shall forward with the nomination documents a statement showing the total number of signatures on the nomination document that have not been marked “not sufficient.”

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1994, Ch. 920, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

8083.

The county elections official’s statement to the Secretary of State of the number of signers shall be in substantially the following form: 
statement of county elections official of number of signers

I, County Elections Official of the County of ____, hereby certify that I have examined the ____ hereto attached filed on behalf of ____, candidate for nomination to the office of ____ at the primary election to be held on the __ day of ____, 20_, and that the total number of signatures which I have not marked “not sufficient” is ____.

Dated this __ day of ____, 20_.

__County Elections Official

(seal)By _________ Deputy

(History: Amended by Stats. 2018, Ch. 58, Sec. 9.   (AB 3259)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

8084.

If the number of signatures affixed to an in-lieu filing fee petition filed pursuant to Section 8106 is 100 or more, the county elections official may use a random sampling technique for verification of the signatures. If a random sampling technique is used, and the number of signatures on a petition is 100 or more but less than 2,000, the random sampling shall include an examination of 100 signatures. If the number of signatures on a petition is 2,000 or more, the random sampling shall include an examination of 5 percent of the signatures. Upon completion of the verification of signatures in the sample, the percentage of signatures which are valid shall be applied and projected to the total number of signatures submitted.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1994, Ch. 920, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 6. Nomination Papers.  Place of Filing.  Fees [8100. - 8107.]

8100.

All nomination documents shall be filed as follows:

(a) For state offices, United States Senators, Representatives in Congress, Members of the State Senate and Assembly, and members of the Board of Equalization, in the office of the Secretary of State.

(b) For all officers to be voted for wholly within one county, except as provided in subdivision (a), in the office of the elections official of that county.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1995, Ch. 736, Sec. 3.   Effective October 10, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------

8101.

All forms required for nomination and election to all congressional, state, county, and political party county central committee offices shall be furnished only by the county elections official. At the time of issuance of those forms the county elections official shall type in the forms the name of the candidate and the office for which he or she is a candidate, shall imprint a stamp which reads “Official Filing Form,” and shall affix his or her signature. The forms shall be distributed without charge to all candidates applying for them.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1994, Ch. 920, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

8102.

No defect in any nomination document presented shall prevent the filing of another nomination document within the period allowed for presenting the nomination document.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1994, Ch. 920, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

8103.

(a) The following fees for filing declarations of candidacy shall be paid to the Secretary of State by each candidate:

(1) Two percent of the first-year salary for the office of United States Senator or for any state office. The fee prescribed in this subdivision does not apply to the office of state Senator, Member of the Assembly, member of the State Board of Equalization, or justice of the court of appeal.

(2) One percent of the first-year salary for the office of Representative in Congress, member of the State Board of Equalization, or justice of the court of appeal.

(3) One percent of the first-year salary for the office of state Senator or Member of the Assembly.

(b) For purposes of this section, “salary” means the annual salary for the office as of the first day on which a candidate may circulate petitions in lieu of filing fees pursuant to Section 8106.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1994, Ch. 920, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

8104.

The filing fee to be paid to the county elections official for filing a declaration of candidacy for an office to be voted for wholly within one county other than a legislative or congressional office shall be as follows:

(a) No filing fee is required from any candidate for an office for which no fixed compensation is payable, or for which the annual salary is two thousand five hundred dollars ($2,500) or less.

(b) A filing fee of 1 percent of the annual salary of the office shall be paid to the county elections official by each candidate for a judicial office or for a county office. This subdivision shall not apply to any candidate for any office for which the annual salary is two thousand five hundred dollars ($2,500) or less.

The filing fee shall be calculated on the basis of the annual salary for the office on the first day to circulate petitions to gather signatures in lieu of filing fees.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1994, Ch. 920, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

8105.

(a) The filing fees for all candidates shall be paid at the time the candidates obtain their nomination forms from the county elections official. The county elections official shall not accept any papers unless the fees are paid at the time required by this section, or unless satisfactory evidence is given to the county elections official or to the registrar of voters that the fee has been paid at the time of the declaration of candidacy in another county. The county elections official shall transmit the appropriate fees to the Secretary of State at the time he or she delivers the declarations of candidacy for filing. All filing fees received by the Secretary of State and county elections officials are nonrefundable.

(b) The filing fees for candidates required to file declarations of intention pursuant to Section 8023 shall be paid at the time the declarations are filed with the county elections official.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2006, Ch. 466, Sec. 4.   Effective January 1, 2007.)
-------------------------------------------

8106.

(a) Notwithstanding any other provision of this article, a candidate, or a person authorized by the candidate, may submit a petition containing signatures of registered voters in lieu of a filing fee as follows:

(1) For the office of California State Assembly, 1,000 signatures.

(2) For the office of California State Senate and the United States House of Representatives, 2,000 signatures.

(3) For candidates running for statewide office, 7,000 signatures.

(4) For all other offices for which a filing fee is required,
 if the number of registered voters in the district in which a candidate seeks nomination is 2,000 or more, the candidate may submit a petition containing three signatures of registered voters for each dollar of the filing fee, or 7 percent of the total of registered voters in the district in which the candidate seeks nomination, whichever is less.

(5) For all other offices for which a filing fee is required, if the number of registered voters in the district in which a candidate seeks nomination is less than 2,000, the candidate may submit a petition containing three signatures of registered voters for each dollar of the filing fee, or 14 percent of the total of registered voters in the district in which the candidate seeks nomination, whichever is less.

(6) A voter may
 sign both a candidate’s nomination papers and in-lieu-filing-fee petition. However, if signatures appearing on the documents are counted towards both the nomination paper and the in-lieu-filing-fee petition signature requirements, a person may only sign one of the documents.

(b) The Secretary of State or an elections official shall furnish to each candidate, upon request, and without charge, forms for securing signatures. The number of forms that the elections official shall furnish a candidate shall be a quantity that provides the candidates with spaces for signatures sufficient in number to equal the number of signatures that the candidate is required to secure pursuant to subdivision (a) if the candidate desires that number of forms. However, the elections official, rather than provide the candidate with the number of forms set forth in
 the preceding sentence, or upon the request of a candidate, may provide the candidate with a master form that may be duplicated by the candidate at the candidate’s expense for the purpose of circulating additional petitions. The Secretary of State shall provide the master form. The elections official may provide candidates a form other than the master form provided by the Secretary of State. However, that form shall meet all statutory requirements, and the elections official shall also make available and accept the master form provided by the Secretary of State. All forms shall be made available commencing 60 days before the first day for circulating nomination papers. However, in cases of vacancies for which a special election is authorized or required to be held to fill the vacancy, and where the prescribed nomination period would commence less than 60 days after the creation of the vacancy, the forms
 shall be made available within five working days after the creation of the vacancy. No other form except the form furnished by the Secretary of State or the elections official or forms duplicated from a master form shall be used to secure signatures. Each petition section shall bear an affidavit signed by the circulator, in substantially the same form as set forth in Section 8041. The substitution of signatures for fees shall be subject to all of the following:

(1) Any registered voter may sign an in-lieu-filing-fee petition for any candidate for whom the voter is eligible to vote.

(2) If a voter signs more candidates’ petitions than there are offices to be filled, the voter’s signatures shall be valid only on those petitions that, taken in the order they were filed, do not exceed the
 number of offices to be filled.

(3) In-lieu-filing-fee petitions shall be filed at least 30 days before the close of the nomination period. Within 10 days after receipt of a petition, the elections official shall notify the candidate of any deficiency. The candidate shall then, at the time of obtaining nomination forms, pay a pro rata portion of the filing fee to cover the deficiency.

(4) If the petition is circulated for an office in more than one county, the candidate shall submit the signatures to the elections official in the county for which the petition was circulated. The elections official shall, at least two days after verifying the signatures on the petition, notify the Secretary of State of the total number of valid signatures. If the number of signatures is insufficient,
 the Secretary of State shall notify the candidate and the elections officials of the fact. The candidate may submit the necessary number of valid signatures at least 30 days before the close of the period for circulating nomination papers. Each circulator shall meet the requirements of Section 102.

(5) Each candidate may submit a greater number of signatures to allow for subsequent losses due to invalidity of some signatures. The elections official shall not be required to determine the validity of a greater number of signatures than that required by this section.

(c) For purposes of this section, the requisite number of signatures shall be computed from the latest registration figures forwarded to the Secretary of State pursuant to Section 2187 before the first day on which petitions
 are available.

(d) All valid signatures obtained pursuant to this section shall be counted toward the number of voters required to sign a nomination paper in accordance with Section 8061 or 8405.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2019, Ch. 562, Sec. 4.   (AB 1829)   Effective January 1, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------

8106.5.

(a) Notwithstanding paragraph (3) of subdivision (b) of Section 8106, if the last day to file in-lieu-filing-fee petitions pursuant to that paragraph for a special election to fill a vacancy occurs before the vacancy begins, or before the Governor calls the special election by issuing a proclamation pursuant to Section 10700, the following apply:

(1) If the nomination period for the special election is 12 days or more, the in-lieu-filing-fee petitions shall be filed at least nine days before the close of the nomination period. Within three days after receipt of a petition, the elections official shall notify the candidate of any deficiency. The candidate shall then, at the time of obtaining nomination forms, pay a pro rata portion of the filing fee to cover the
 deficiency.

(2) If the nomination period for the special election is 11 days or less, the Secretary of State shall set the time for filing in-lieu-filing-fee petitions and the time by which the elections official shall notify the candidate of any deficiency. If there is a deficiency, the candidate shall, at the time of obtaining nomination forms, pay a pro rata portion of the filing fee to cover the deficiency.

(b) If the number of days for a candidate to collect signatures on a petition in lieu of a filing fee for a special election that is held to fill a vacancy is less than the number of days that a candidate would have to collect signatures on a petition for a regular election for the same office, the elections official shall reduce the required number of signatures for the petition, as specified in subdivision (a) of Section 8106, by the same proportion as the reduction in
 time for the candidate to collect signatures.

(c) Notwithstanding subdivision (b), the number of signatures required on an in-lieu-filing-fee petition for a special election held to fill a vacancy in the office of Representative in Congress, State Senator, or Member of the Assembly shall be not less than 100.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2019, Ch. 497, Sec. 104.   (AB 991)   Effective January 1, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------

8107.

The county elections official shall pay to the county treasurer all fees received from candidates pursuant to Section 8105. Within 10 days after the direct primary, the Secretary of State shall pay to the State Treasurer all fees received from candidates pursuant to Section 8103, which shall be deposited in the General Fund.

It is the intention of the Legislature that the funds deposited in the General Fund pursuant to this section will be used by the Secretary of State in the performance of his or her duties pursuant to Chapter 1 (commencing with Section 19000) of Division 19, to the extent that appropriations are made in the Budget Act from year to year.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1994, Ch. 920, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 7. Certified List of Candidates [8120. - 8125.]

8120.

At least 68 days before the direct primary, the Secretary of State shall transmit to each county elections official a certified list of candidates who are eligible to be voted for in his or her county at the direct primary.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1994, Ch. 920, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

8121.

(a) Not less than five days before he or she transmits the certified list of candidates to the county elections officials, as provided in Section 8120, the Secretary of State shall notify each candidate for partisan office and voter-nominated office of the names, addresses, offices, occupations, and party preferences of all other persons who have filed for the same office.

(b) (1) Beginning not less than five days before he or she transmits the certified list of candidates to the county elections officials, as required by Section 8120, the Secretary of State shall post, in a conspicuous place on his or her Internet Web site, the party preference history of each candidate for voter-nominated office for
 the preceding 10 years, or for as long as he or she has been eligible to vote in the state if less than 10 years. The candidates’ party preference history shall be continuously posted until such time as the official canvass is completed for the general or special election at which a candidate is elected to the voter-nominated office sought, except that, in the case of a candidate who participated in the primary election and who was not nominated to participate in the general election, the candidate’s party preference history need not continue to be posted following the completion of the official canvass for the primary election in question.

(2) For purposes of this subdivision, “party preference history” also refers to the candidate’s history of party registration during the 10 years preceding the effective date of this section.

(3) The Secretary of State shall also conspicuously
 post on the same Internet Web site as that containing the candidates’ party preference history the notice specified by subdivision (b) of Section 9083.5.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2012, Ch. 3, Sec. 19.   (AB 1413)   Effective February 10, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

8122.

The Secretary of State shall certify and transmit the list of candidates for nomination to each office according to Assembly districts, in the order of arrangement prescribed in Chapter 2 (commencing with Section 13100) of Division 13. In the case of each county containing more than one Assembly district, the Secretary of State shall transmit separate lists for each Assembly district.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1994, Ch. 920, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

8123.

The Secretary of State, at the time he or she transmits the list of candidates to the county elections official, shall inform the county elections official of the address of each candidate.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1994, Ch. 920, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

8124.

The certified list of candidates sent to each county elections official by the Secretary of State shall show all of the following:

(a) The name of each candidate.

(b) The office for which each person is a candidate.

(c) With respect to candidates for partisan offices, the party each person represents.

(d) With respect to candidates for voter-nominated offices, the designation made by the candidate pursuant to Section 8002.5.

(e) If applicable, the ballot designation specified in accordance
 with Section 13107.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2012, Ch. 3, Sec. 20.   (AB 1413)   Effective February 10, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

8125.

The certified list of candidates sent to each county elections official by the Secretary of State shall be in a form prescribed by the Secretary of State.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 2009, Ch. 1, Sec. 26.   (SB 6)   Effective January 1, 2010.   Operative January 1, 2011, pursuant to Sec. 67 of Ch. 1.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 8. Nominated Candidates [8140. - 8150.]

8140.

Any candidate for a nonpartisan office who at a primary election receives votes on a majority of all the ballots cast for candidates for that office shall be elected to that office. Where two or more candidates are to be elected to a given office and a greater number of candidates receive a majority than the number to be elected, those candidates shall be elected who secure the highest votes of those receiving a majority, and equal in number to the number to be elected.

Where a candidate has been elected to a nonpartisan office at the primary election, that office shall not appear on the ballot at the ensuing general election, notwithstanding the death, resignation, or other disqualification of the candidate at a time subsequent to the primary election.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1994, Ch. 920, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

8141.

If no candidate has been elected to a nonpartisan office pursuant to Section 8140 or if the number of candidates elected at the primary election is less than the total number to be elected to that office, then candidates for that office at the ensuing election shall be those candidates not elected at the primary who received the next highest number of votes cast for nomination to that office, equal in number to twice the number remaining to be elected to that office, or less, if the total number of candidates not elected is less.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1994, Ch. 920, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

8141.5.

Except as provided in subdivision (b) of Section 8142, only the candidates for a voter-nominated office who receive the highest or second highest number of votes cast at the primary election shall appear on the ballot as candidates for that office at the ensuing general election. More than one candidate with the same party preference designation may participate in the general election pursuant to this subdivision. Notwithstanding the designation made by the candidate pursuant to Section 8002.5, no candidate for a voter-nominated office shall be deemed to be the official nominee for that office of any political party, and no party is entitled to have a candidate with its party preference designation participate in the general election unless that candidate is one of the candidates receiving the highest or
 second highest number of votes cast at the primary election.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2012, Ch. 3, Sec. 21.   (AB 1413)   Effective February 10, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

8142.

(a) In the case of a tie vote, nonpartisan candidates receiving the same number of votes shall be candidates at the ensuing general election if they qualify pursuant to Section 8141 whether or not there are more candidates at the general election than prescribed by this article. In no case shall the tie be determined by lot.

(b) In the case of a tie vote among candidates at a primary election for a voter-nominated office, the following applies:

(1) All candidates receiving the highest number of votes cast for any candidate shall be candidates at the ensuing general election whether or not there are more candidates at the general election than prescribed by this
 article.

(2) Notwithstanding Section 8141.5, if a tie vote among candidates results in more than one primary candidate qualifying for the general election pursuant to subdivision (a), candidates receiving fewer votes shall not be candidates at the general election, even if they receive the second highest number of votes cast.

(3) If only one candidate receives the highest number of votes cast but there is a tie vote among two or more candidates receiving the second highest number of votes cast, each of those second-place candidates shall be a candidate at the ensuing general election along with the candidate receiving the highest number of votes cast, regardless of whether there are more candidates at the general election than prescribed by this article.

(4) In no case shall the tie be determined by
 lot.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2012, Ch. 3, Sec. 22.   (AB 1413)   Effective February 10, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

8143.

If the number of candidates elected at a primary election to any nonpartisan office is less than the number of persons to be elected to that office, there shall be printed on the ballot, in a group, only the names of the other candidates receiving the next highest number of votes for nomination to that office as may equal twice the number of persons remaining to be elected to that office, or a smaller number if the list of candidates is exhausted. This group shall be preceded by the designation of the office and the words “vote for ____,” the blank being filled by a number equal to the number of persons remaining to be elected to that office.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1994, Ch. 920, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

8144.

The candidates for election to membership on the county central committee, equal in number to the number to be elected, receiving the highest number of votes in their supervisorial district or Assembly district, as the case may be, shall be declared elected.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1994, Ch. 920, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

8145.

It is the duty of the officers charged with the canvass of the returns of any primary election in any county or city to issue certificates of nomination to candidates nominated for nonpartisan offices voted for wholly within one county.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2012, Ch. 8, Sec. 14.   (AB 1200)   Effective March 8, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

8146.

Certificates of nomination or election issued by county or municipal officers shall be issued immediately upon the completion of the canvass of the returns at the primary election.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1994, Ch. 920, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

8147.

The Secretary of State shall issue certificates of nomination to candidates nominated for Representatives in Congress, Members of the State Senate and Assembly, members of the State Board of Equalization, and for all statewide offices.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1994, Ch. 920, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

8147.5.
